test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-maeaeqdlw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - mǟʼdlõ: # Verb 60 'eng /est mäletada/fin' - full paradigm
     mǟʼdlõ+V+Inf: [mǟʼdlõ, mǟdlõ]
     mǟʼdlõ+V+Ger: [mǟʼdlõs, mǟdlõs]
     mǟʼdlõ+V+Sup: [mǟʼdlõm, mǟdlõm]
     mǟʼdlõ+V+Sup+Ine: [mǟʼdlõmõs, mǟdlõmõs]
     mǟʼdlõ+V+Sup+Ela: [mǟʼdlõmõst, mǟdlõmõst]
     mǟʼdlõ+V+Sup+Tra: [mǟʼdlõmõks, mǟdlõmõks]
     mǟʼdlõ+V+Sup+Abe: [mǟʼdlõmõt, mǟdlõmõt]
     mǟʼdlõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: [mǟʼdlõb, mǟdlõb]
     mǟʼdlõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [mǟʼdlõt, mǟdlõt]
     mǟʼdlõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [mǟʼdlõbõd, mǟdlõbõd]
     mǟʼdlõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [mǟʼdliz, mǟdliz]
     mǟʼdlõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [[mǟʼdlizt, mǟʼdliztõ], [mǟdlizt, mǟʼdliztõ]]
     mǟʼdlõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [[mǟʼdlizt, mǟʼdliztõ], [mǟdlizt, mǟʼdliztõ]]
     mǟʼdlõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: [mǟʼdlõ, mǟdlõ]
     mǟʼdlõ+V+Cond+Sg3: [mǟʼdlõks, mǟdlõks]
     mǟʼdlõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: [mǟʼdõl, mǟdõl]
     mǟʼdlõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: [mǟʼdõl, mǟdõl]
     mǟʼdlõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: [mǟʼdlõgid, mǟdlõgid]
     mǟʼdlõ+V+Jus+Sg3: [mǟʼdlõg, mǟdlõg]
     mǟʼdlõ+V+Quo+Sg3: [mǟʼdliji, mǟdliji]
     mǟʼdlõ+V+ActPrfPrc: [mǟʼdlõn, mǟdlõn]
     mǟʼdlõ+V+PssPrfPrc: [mǟʼdõltõd, mǟdõltõd]
